Delaware, session 153, HB302.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 106, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 10608. State government websites. (a) For purposes of this section: (1) âLimited English proficiencyâ means not using English as a primary language and having a limited ability to read, write, speak, or understand English. (2) âMachine translationâ means the use of automated software that translates text without human involvement. (3) âProgramâ means all of the operations of a State department, State agency, or any other instrumentality of the State. (b)(1) Except as provided by subsection (c) of this section, all State department, agency, and program websites that are available to and used by members of the general public must be available in any language that meets the following conditions: a. Is spoken by a limited English proficient population that constitutes at least .5% of the overall population within the State, as measured by the most recent United States Census. b. Can be translated free of charge. (2) If machine translation services are used to carry out the provisions of this subsection, the translated website must post conspicuously on its website a disclaimer that the State department, agency, or program: a. Does not guarantee the accuracy or reliability of the translation. b. Is not liable for any loss or damage arising out of the use of or reliance on the translated content. (c) A State department, agency, or program is not required to provide translated websites if any of the following apply: (1) The State department, agency, or program determines that an inaccurate translation of the content could lead to a denial of services or benefits. (2) The content cannot be translated due to the limitations of machine translation software, including in PDF format, images, and videos. (d)(1) The Government Information Center must establish minimum standards to which translated websites required under this section must conform. (2) The minimum standards established by paragraph (d)(1) of this section must include a standard regarding the prominent placement of website links on the English version of a website that direct the user to each required translated version of the website. Section 2. This Act will be effective immediately and must be implemented as follows: (1) The Government Information Center must establish minimum standards for translated websites, as required by Section 1 of this Act, within 6 months of this Actâs enactment into law. (2) The rest of this Act must be implemented no later than 2 years after its enactment into law.